California, session 20252026, AB2775.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. It is the intent of the Legislature to work with stakeholders to examine licensed chiropractors holding specialized certification who provide chiropractic care to animal patients and evaluate opportunities to expand access to qualified animal chiropractic care while ensuring appropriate consumer and animal protections are in place.SEC. 2. Section 480 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:480. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, a board may deny a license regulated by this code on the grounds that the applicant has been convicted of a crime or has been subject to formal discipline only if either of the following conditions are met:(1) The applicant has been convicted of a crime within the preceding seven years from the date of application that is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of the business or profession for which the application is made, regardless of whether the applicant was incarcerated for that crime, or the applicant has been convicted of a crime that is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of the business or profession for which the application is made and for which the applicant is presently incarcerated or for which the applicant was released from incarceration within the preceding seven years from the date of application. However, the preceding seven-year limitation shall not apply in either of the following situations:(A) The applicant was convicted of a serious felony, as defined in Section 1192.7 of the Penal Code or a crime for which registration is required pursuant to paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 290 of the Penal Code.(B) The applicant was convicted of a financial crime currently classified as a felony that is directly and adversely related to the fiduciary qualifications, functions, or duties of the business or profession for which the application is made, pursuant to regulations adopted by the board, and for which the applicant is seeking licensure under any of the following:(i) Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 3.(ii) Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3.(iii) Chapter 11.3 (commencing with Section 7512) of Division 3.(iv) Licensure as a funeral director or cemetery manager under Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 7600) of Division 3.(v) Division 4 (commencing with Section 10000).(2) The applicant has been subjected to formal discipline by a licensing board in or outside California within the preceding seven years from the date of application based on professional misconduct that would have been cause for discipline before the board for which the present application is made and that is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of the business or profession for which the present application is made. However, prior disciplinary action by a licensing board within the preceding seven years shall not be the basis for denial of a license if the basis for that disciplinary action was a conviction that has been dismissed pursuant to Section 1203.4, 1203.4a, 1203.41, 1203.42, or 1203.425 of the Penal Code or a comparable dismissal or expungement. Formal discipline that occurred earlier than seven years preceding the date of application may be grounds for denial of a license only if the formal discipline was for either of the following:(A) Conduct that, if committed in this state by a physician and surgeon licensed pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of Division 2, would have constituted an act of sexual abuse, misconduct, or relations with a patient pursuant to Section 726 or sexual exploitation as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 729.(B) Conduct that, if committed in this state by a chiropractor licensed pursuant to the Chiropractic Initiative Act, would have constituted an act of sexual abuse, misconduct, or relations with a patient pursuant to Section 726.(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, a person shall not be denied a license on the basis that the person has been convicted of a crime, or on the basis of acts underlying a conviction for a crime, if that person has obtained a certificate of rehabilitation under Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 4852.01) of Title 6 of Part 3 of the Penal Code, has been granted clemency or a pardon by a state or federal executive, or has made a showing of rehabilitation pursuant to Section 482.(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, a person shall not be denied a license on the basis of any conviction, or on the basis of the acts underlying the conviction, that has been dismissed pursuant to Section 1203.4, 1203.4a, 1203.41, 1203.42, or 1203.425 of the Penal Code, or a comparable dismissal or expungement. An applicant who has a conviction that has been dismissed pursuant to Section 1203.4, 1203.4a, 1203.41, or 1203.42 of the Penal Code shall provide proof of the dismissal if it is not reflected on the report furnished by the Department of Justice.(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, a board shall not deny a license on the basis of an arrest that resulted in a disposition other than a conviction, including an arrest that resulted in an infraction, citation, or a juvenile adjudication.(e) A board may deny a license regulated by this code on the ground grounds that the applicant knowingly made a false statement of fact that is required to be revealed in the application for the license. A board shall not deny a license based solely on an applicant’s failure to disclose a fact that would not have been cause for denial of the license had it been disclosed.(f) A board shall follow the following procedures in requesting or acting on an applicant’s criminal history information:(1) A board issuing a license pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5500), Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 5615), Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 7301), Chapter 20 (commencing with Section 9800), or Chapter 20.3 (commencing with Section 9880) of Division 3, or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 19000) or Chapter 3.1 (commencing with Section 19225) of Division 8 may require applicants for licensure under those chapters to disclose criminal conviction history on an application for licensure.(2) Except as provided in paragraph (1), a board shall not require an applicant for licensure to disclose any information or documentation regarding the applicant’s criminal history. However, a board may request mitigating information from an applicant regarding the applicant’s criminal history for purposes of determining substantial relation or demonstrating evidence of rehabilitation, provided that the applicant is informed that disclosure is voluntary and that the applicant’s decision not to disclose any information shall not be a factor in a board’s decision to grant or deny an application for licensure.(3) If a board decides to deny an application for licensure based solely or in part on the applicant’s conviction history, the board shall notify the applicant in writing of all of the following:(A) The denial or disqualification of licensure.(B) Any existing procedure the board has for the applicant to challenge the decision or to request reconsideration.(C) That the applicant has the right to appeal the board’s decision.(D) The processes for the applicant to request a copy of the applicant’s complete conviction history and question the accuracy or completeness of the record pursuant to Sections 11122 to 11127 of the Penal Code.(g) (1) For a minimum of three years, each board under this code shall retain application forms and other documents submitted by an applicant, any notice provided to an applicant, all other communications received from and provided to an applicant, and criminal history reports of an applicant.(2) Each board under this code shall retain the number of applications received for each license and the number of applications requiring inquiries regarding criminal history. In addition, each licensing authority shall retain all of the following information:(A) The number of applicants with a criminal record who received notice of denial or disqualification of licensure.(B) The number of applicants with a criminal record who provided evidence of mitigation or rehabilitation.(C) The number of applicants with a criminal record who appealed any denial or disqualification of licensure.(D) The final disposition and demographic information, consisting of voluntarily provided information on race or gender, of any applicant described in subparagraph (A), (B), or (C).(3) (A) Each board under this code shall annually make available to the public through the board’s internet website and through a report submitted to the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature deidentified information collected pursuant to this subdivision. Each board shall ensure confidentiality of the individual applicants.(B) A report pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(h) “Conviction” as used in this section shall have the same meaning as defined in Section 7.5.(i) This section does not in any way modify or otherwise affect the existing authority of the following entities in regard to licensure:(1) The State Athletic Commission.(2) The Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education.(3) The California Horse Racing Board.SEC. 3. Section 1000 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:1000. (a) The law governing practitioners of chiropractic is found in an initiative act entitled “An act prescribing the terms upon which licenses may be issued to practitioners of chiropractic, creating the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners and declaring its powers and duties, prescribing penalties for violation hereof, and repealing all acts and parts of acts inconsistent herewith,” adopted by the electors November 7, 1992, which may be cited as the Chiropractic Initiative Act.(b) The State Board of Chiropractic Examiners is within the Department of Consumer Affairs.(c) Notwithstanding any other law, the powers and duties of the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners, as set forth in this article and under the Chiropractic Initiative Act shall be subject to review by the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature. The review shall be performed as if this chapter were scheduled to be repealed as of January 1, 2031.SEC. 4. Section 1001 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:1001. In each year, the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners shall compile and may thereafter publish and sell a complete directory of all persons within the state who hold unforfeited and unrevoked certificates to practice chiropractic, and whose certificate in any manner authorizes the treatment of human beings for diseases, injuries, deformities, or any other physical or mental conditions.The directory shall contain:(a) The following information concerning each such person:(1) The name, address, telephone number, and email of such person.(2) The names and symbols indicating their title.(3) The school, attendance at which qualified them for examination or admission to practice.(4) The date of the issuance of their certificate.(b) The annual report of the board for the prior year.(c) Information relating to other laws of this state and the United States which the board determines to be of interest to persons licensed to practice chiropractic.(d) Copies of opinions of the Attorney General relating to the practice of chiropractic.(e) A copy of the provisions of this chapter and a copy of the act cited in Section 1000.The board may require the persons designated in this section to furnish such information as it may deem necessary to enable it to compile the directory. Every person so designated shall report immediately each and every change of residence or contact information, giving both their old and new address or contact information, as applicable.The directory shall be evidence of the right of the persons named in it to practice unless their certificate to practice chiropractic has been canceled, suspended, or revoked. The board may collect from each person who voluntarily subscribes to or purchases a copy of the directory the cost of publication and distribution thereof, except that one copy of the directory shall be distributed electronically to each certificate holder of the board. If a certificate holder requests distribution by mail, the board shall distribute one copy of the directory to a certificate holder by mail, but the board shall not charge the certificate holder for the cost of publication and distribution.SEC. 5. Section 1006.5 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:1006.5. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, the amount of regulatory fees necessary to carry out the responsibilities required by the Chiropractic Initiative Act and this chapter are, unless a lower fee is adopted by the board by regulation, fixed in the following schedule:(1) Fee The fee to apply for a license to practice chiropractic: three hundred forty-five dollars ($345). chiropractic shall be two hundred five dollars ($205) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed two hundred eighty dollars ($280).(2) Fee The fee for issuance of an initial license to practice chiropractic: one hundred thirty-seven dollars ($137). chiropractic shall be one hundred sixty dollars ($160) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed two hundred fifteen dollars ($215).(3) The fee to renew an active or inactive license to practice chiropractic shall be three hundred thirty-six dollars ($336) and may be increased to not more than five hundred dollars ($500) and, if a lower fee is fixed by the board, shall be an amount sufficient to support the functions of the board in the administration of the Chiropractic Initiative Act and this chapter. four hundred dollars ($400) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed six hundred fifty dollars ($650).(4) Fee The fee to apply for approval as a continuing education provider: two hundred ninety-one dollars ($291). provider shall be three hundred thirty-five dollars ($335) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed four hundred fifty dollars ($450).(5) Biennial The fee to renew as a continuing education provider renewal fee: one hundred eighteen dollars ($118). shall be two hundred eighty-five dollars ($285) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed three hundred eighty-five dollars ($385).(6) Fee The fee to apply for approval of a continuing education course: one hundred sixteen dollars ($116) per hour of instruction. course shall be thirty-five dollars ($35) per hour of instruction and may be increased to an amount not to exceed sixty dollars ($60) per hour of instruction.(7) Fee The fee to apply for a satellite office certificate: sixty-nine dollars ($69). certificate shall be eighty dollars ($80) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed one hundred ten dollars ($110).(8) Fee The fee to renew a satellite office certificate: fifty dollars ($50). certificate shall be sixty dollars ($60) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed eighty-five dollars ($85).(9) Fee The fee to apply for a license to practice chiropractic pursuant to Section 9 of the Chiropractic Initiative Act: two hundred eighty-three dollars ($283). Act shall be equal to the application fee specified in paragraph (1) unless a lower fee is adopted by the board by regulation.(10) Fee The fee to apply for a certificate of registration of a chiropractic corporation: one hundred seventy-one dollars ($171). corporation shall be one hundred ninety-five dollars ($195) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed two hundred sixty-five dollars ($265).(11) Fee The fee to renew a certificate of registration of a chiropractic corporation: sixty-two dollars ($62). corporation shall be seventy-five dollars ($75) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed one hundred five dollars ($105).(12) Fee The fee to file a chiropractic corporation special report: ninety-eight dollars ($98). report shall be one hundred fifteen dollars ($115) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed one hundred fifty-five dollars ($155).(13) Fee The fee to apply for approval as a referral service: two hundred seventy-nine dollars ($279). service shall be three hundred twenty dollars ($320) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed four hundred thirty dollars ($430).(14) Fee The fee for an endorsed verification of licensure: eighty-three dollars ($83). licensure shall be seventy-five dollars ($75) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed one hundred five dollars ($105).(15) Fee The fee for replacement of a lost or destroyed license: seventy-one dollars ($71). license to practice chiropractic shall be seventy dollars ($70) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed ninety-five dollars ($95).(16) Fee The fee for replacement of a satellite office certificate: seventy-one dollars ($71). certificate shall be seventy dollars ($70) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed ninety-five dollars ($95).(17) Fee The fee for replacement of a certificate of registration of a chiropractic corporation: seventy dollars ($70). corporation shall be seventy dollars ($70) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed ninety-five dollars ($95).(18) Fee The fee to restore a forfeited or canceled license to practice chiropractic: chiropractic shall be double the annual renewal fee specified in subdivision (c). paragraph (3).(19) Fee The fee to apply for approval to serve as a preceptor: seventy-two dollars ($72). preceptor shall be seventy-five dollars ($75) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed one hundred five dollars ($105).(20) The penalty fees for the delinquent renewal of a satellite office certificate, certificate of registration of a chiropractic corporation, or continuing education provider status shall be set by the board in accordance with Section 163.5. (20)Fee(21) The fee to petition for reinstatement of a revoked license: or surrendered license shall be four thousand one hundred eighty-five dollars ($4,185).(21)Fee(22) The fee to petition for early termination of probation: probation shall be three thousand one hundred ninety-five dollars ($3,195).(22)Fee(23) The fee to petition for reduction of penalty: penalty shall be three thousand one hundred ninety-five dollars ($3,195).(23)The penalty fees for the delinquent renewal of a satellite office certificate, certificate of registration of a chiropractic corporation, or continuing education provider status shall be set by the board in accordance with Section 163.5.(b) If a lower fee than the minimum specified in subdivision (a) is adopted by the board by regulation, it shall be an amount sufficient to support the functions of the board in the administration of the Chiropractic Initiative Act and this chapter.(c) The board may establish, by regulation, a system for the issuance and renewal of a chiropractic facility permit. The board may charge application, renewal, and replacement permit fees in an amount sufficient to cover the reasonable regulatory cost to the board to administer this permit system and not to exceed the limits specified for a satellite office certificate in paragraphs (7), (8), (16), and (23) (20) of subdivision (a).(d) The board may establish, by regulation, a system for the issuance of a temporary license to practice chiropractic to an applicant who does not qualify for a temporary license pursuant to Section 115.6. The board may charge application, issuance, and replacement license fees in an amount sufficient to cover the reasonable regulatory cost to the board to administer this temporary license system and not to exceed the limits specified for a license to practice chiropractic in paragraphs (1), (2), and (15) of subdivision (a).SEC. 6. Section 1008 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:1008. (a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), the board or its designee may automatically revoke a license to practice chiropractic under either any of the following circumstances:(1) The licensee has been convicted in any court in or outside of this state of any offense that, if committed or attempted in this state, based on the elements of the convicted offense, would have been punishable as one or more of the offenses described in subdivision (c) of Section 290 of the Penal Code.(2) The licensee is required to register as a sex offender pursuant to the provisions of Section 290 of the Penal Code.(3) The licensee has been convicted of any offense that is subject to the mandatory 10-year license revocation period specified in subdivision (b) of Section 1003.(b) This section shall not apply to a person who is required to register as a sex offender pursuant to Section 290 of the Penal Code solely because of a misdemeanor conviction under Section 314 of the Penal Code.(c) The licensee may request a hearing within 30 days of the automatic revocation order. The proceeding shall be conducted in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).(d) A plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction after a plea of nolo contendere is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this section. The record of conviction shall be conclusive evidence of the fact that the conviction occurred.(e) If the related conviction of the licensee is overturned on appeal, the revocation ordered pursuant to this section shall automatically cease. The licensee shall provide the board with certified court records or other satisfactory proof establishing that the conviction has been overturned, and the board shall not be required to take action to restore the license until such proof is received. Nothing in this subdivision shall prohibit the board from pursuing disciplinary action against the licensee based on any cause other than the overturned conviction, including, but not limited to, the underlying conduct alleged in the criminal case.SEC. 7. Section 1009 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:1009. (a) The board or its designee may automatically suspend a license to practice chiropractic following a conviction of a serious felony, as defined in Section 1192.7 of the Penal Code, by a licensee.(b) The suspension may remain in effect until the time for appeal has elapsed if no appeal has been taken, or until judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal, or has otherwise become final, and until the further order of the board.(c) The licensee may request a hearing within 30 days of the automatic suspension order. The proceeding shall be conducted in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).(d) If the related conviction of the licensee is overturned on appeal, any suspension order issued pursuant to this section shall be rescinded by the board. The licensee shall provide the board with certified court records or other satisfactory proof establishing that the conviction has been overturned, and the board shall not be required to take action to restore the license until such proof is received. Nothing in this subdivision shall prohibit the board from pursuing disciplinary action against the licensee based on any cause other than the overturned conviction, including, but not limited to, the underlying conduct alleged in the criminal case.SEC. 8. Section 1056 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:1056. The income of a chiropractic corporation attributable to professional services rendered while a shareholder is a disqualified person (as defined in the Professional Corporation Act) shall not in any manner accrue to the benefit of the shareholder or their shares in the chiropractic corporation.